src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
støvsúgva:støv#súgv s41 ;
forskjóta:for#sk s38 ;
kondirenna:kondi#renn s48_2 ;
forbinda:for#bin s45 ;
uppdríva:upp#drív s35 ;
blíva:blív s35 ;
binda:bin s45 ;
trælabinda:træla#bin s45 ;
múlabinda:múla#bin s45 ;
svínabinda:svína#bin s45 ;
rúnabinda:rúna#bin s45 ;
skuldbinda:skuld#bin s45 ;
gandbinda:gand#bin s45 ;
hugbinda:hug#bin s45 ;
vágbinda:vág#bin s45 ;
bakbinda:bak#bin s45 ;
trøllbinda:trøll#bin s45 ;
málbinda:mál#bin s45 ;
trælbinda:træl#bin s45 ;
múlbinda:múl#bin s45 ;
sambinda:sam#bin s45 ;
jarnbinda:jarn#bin s45 ;
tvørbinda:tvør#bin s45 ;
grasbinda:gras#bin s45 ;
kjaftbinda:kjaft#bin s45 ;
sperrubinda:sperru#bin s45 ;
nevbinda:nev#bin s45 ;
hábinda:há#bin s45 ;
raðbinda:rað#bin s45 ;
staðbinda:stað#bin s45 ;
turrvinda:turrvin s45 ;
treffa:treff s49_2 ;
springa:spring s46 ;
stinga:sting s46 ;
meinstinga:mein#sting s46 ;
undirstinga:undir#sting s46 ;
mønustinga:mønu#sting s46 ;
míga:míg s35 ;
níga:níg s35 ;
stíga:stíg s35 ;
misstíga:misstíg s35 ;
doyggja:doy s34 ;
rakdoyggja:rakdoy s34 ;
steindoyggja:steindoy s34 ;
sjálvdoyggja:sjálvdoy s34 ;
strádoyggja:strádoy s34 ;
bráðdoyggja:bráðdoy s34 ;
goyggja:goy s34 ;
spýggja:spý s34 ;
svíkja:svík s36 ;
svimja:sv s47 ;
grulvisvimja:grulvi#sv s47 ;
kappsvimja:kapp#sv s47 ;
drekka:drekk s48 ;
kappdrekka:kappdrekk s48 ;
grúvudrekka:grúvudrekk s48 ;
ovdrekka:ov#drekk s48 ;
fúka:fúk s40 ;
húka:húk s40 ;
rúka:rúk s40 ;
strúka:strúk s40 ;
kringrenna:kringrenn s48_2 ;
steinrenna:steinrenn s48_2 ;
vatnrenna:vatnrenn s48_2 ;
kapprenna:kapprenn s48_2 ;
hálvrenna:hálvrenn s48_2 ;
ovrenna:ov#renn s48_2 ;
finna:fin s44 ;
uppfinna:upp#fin s44 ;
frífinna:frí#fin s44 ;
spinna:spin s44 ;
vinna:vin s44 ;
yvirvinna:yvir#vin s44 ;
forvinna:for#vin s44 ;
endurvinna:endur#vin s44 ;
svinna:svin s44 ;
útvinna:út#vin s44 ;
skína:skín s35 ;
rína:rín s35 ;
grína:grín s35 ;
flórgrína:flórgrín s35 ;
trína:trín s35 ;
órína:órín s35 ;
hvína:hvín s35 ;
grípa:gríp s35 ;
drúpa:drúp s40 ;
krúpa:krúp s40 ;
súpa:súp s40 ;
kappsúpa:kapp#súp s40 ;
ovsúpa:ov#súp s40 ;
rísa:rís s35 ;
gjósa:g s39s ;
njósa:n s39s ;
detta:dett s49 ;
bíta:bít s35 ;
hugbíta:hugbít s35 ;
bakbíta:bakbít s35 ;
skammbíta:skammbít s35 ;
rótbíta:rótbít s35 ;
kjøtbíta:kjøtbít s35 ;
skíta:skít s35 ;
líta:lít s35 ;
forlíta:for#lít s35 ;
slíta:slít s35 ;
níta:nít s35 ;
skjóta:sk s38 ;
lamskjóta:lam#sk s38 ;
steinskjóta:stein#sk s38 ;
kappskjóta:kapp#sk s38 ;
ørskjóta:ør#sk s38 ;
knæskjóta:knæ#sk s38 ;
njóta:n s39 ;
flóta:flót s37 ;
bróta:brót s37 ;
ryggbróta:ryggbrót s37 ;
beinbróta:beinbrót s37 ;
grunnbróta:grunnbrót s37 ;
tvørbróta:tvørbrót s37 ;
kjaftbróta:kjaftbrót s37 ;
skortbróta:skortbrót s37 ;
neyðbróta:neyðbrót s37 ;
rógva:ró s33 ;
andrógva:and#ró s33 ;
grógva:gró s33 ;
grasgrógva:gras#gró s33 ;
kapprógva:kapp#ró s33 ;
bátsrógva:báts#ró s33 ;
ovrógva:ov#ró s33 ;
deyðrógva:deyð#ró s33 ;
búgva:bú s32 ;
haldbúgva:hald#bú s32 ;
fyribúgva:fyri#bú s32 ;
herbúgva:her#bú s32 ;
serbúgva:ser#bú s32/30 ;
serútbúgva:ser#út#bú s32/30 ;
endurbúgva:endur#bú s32/30 ;
endurútbúgva:endur#út#bú s32/30 ;
skreytbúgva:skreyt#bú s32 ;
útbúgva:út#bú s32/30 ;
flúgva:flúgv s41 ;
royndarflúgva:royndar#flúgv s41 ;
klúgva:kl s42 ;
krossklúgva:kross#kl s42 ;
smúgva:smúgv s41 ;
snúgva:snú s32 ;
rangsnúgva:rangsnú s32 ;
bráðsnúgva:bráðsnú s32 ;
trúgva:trú s32 ;
vantrúgva:vantrú s32 ;
mistrúgva:mistrú s32 ;
súgva:súgv s41 ;
mergsúgva:merg#súgv s41 ;
turrsúgva:turr#súgv s41 ;
dustsúgva:dust#súgv s41 ;
máttsúgva:mátt#súgv s41 ;
trásúgva:trá#súgv s41 ;
klíva:klív s35 ;
ríva:rív s35 ;
dríva:drív s35 ;
dropadríva:dropadrív s35 ;
tríva:trív s35 ;
svíva:svív s35 ;
líða:líð s35 ;
ríða:ríð s35 ;
kappríða:kappríð s35 ;
innsjóða:inn#s s39d ;
bjóða:b s39d ;
forbjóða:for#b s39d ;
gretta:gr s49 ;
javnbjóða:javn#b s39d ;
kjósa:k s39s ;
kvetta:kvett s49 ;
løgbjóða:løg#b s39d ;
lúka:lúk s40 ;
meinbjóða:mein#b s39d ;
misbjóða:mis#b s39d ;
riða:rið s35 ;
sølubjóða:sølu#b s39d ;
vanbjóða:van#b s39d ;
viðvíkja:við#vík s36 ;
víkja:vík s36 ;
yvirbjóða:yvir#b s39d ;
forsvinna:for#svin s44 ;
motorbúgva:motorbú s32 ;
dríta:drít s35 ;
byggibúgva:byggi#bú s32 ;
eftirútbúgva:eftir#út#bú s32/30 ;
nýútbúgva:ný#út#bú s32/30 ;
eftirbúgva:eftir#bú s32/30 ;
